Louisiana, session 2026, HB801.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:463.243 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§463.243. Special prestige license plate; Classic Black We Will Never Forget:
Caroline and Maggie plate
A.(1) The secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall
establish a special prestige motor vehicle license plate to be known as the "Classic
Black We Will Never Forget: Caroline and Maggie" plate, provided that there is a
minimum of one thousand applicants for such plate. The plate shall be restricted to
use on passenger cars, pickup trucks, recreational vehicles, motorcycles, and vans.
(2) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, shall create this special prestige license plate when the applicable statutory
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 801 ENROLLED
provisions are met and the department's electronic vehicle and registration system
is updated to accommodate the creation of the new plates.
B. The design shall display the license plate number as a white alpha-
numeric series on a black background in compliance with R.S. 47:463(A)(3). The
design shall include a white border with "LOUISIANA" centered at the top of the
plate.
C. The special prestige license plate shall be issued, upon application, to any
citizen of Louisiana in the same manner as any other motor vehicle license plate.
D. The department shall collect an annual royalty fee of twenty-five dollars
that shall be disbursed in accordance with Subsection E of this Section. This royalty
fee shall be in addition to the standard motor vehicle license tax imposed by Article
VII, Section 5 of the Constitution of Louisiana and a handling fee of three dollars
and fifty cents for each plate to be retained by the department to offset a portion of
administrative costs.
E. The annual royalty fee shall be collected by the department and forwarded
to the Donald J. Thibodeaux Training Center in Zachary, Louisiana. The monies
received from the royalty fees shall be used for emergency vehicle operations
training for local governments pursuant to R.S. 40:1375.
F. The secretary shall promulgate and adopt rules and regulations as are
necessary to implement the provisions of this Section.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.